Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Editor's notes. —

Laws 2018, ch. 89, § 2, provides: “Licenses issued under title 23 of the Wyoming statutes before January 1, 2019, shall expire in accordance with the applicable provisions of law existing prior to amendment by this act.”

Laws 2018, ch. 89, § 3, provides: “Before January 1, 2019, the game and fish commission shall promulgate rules on license expirations and reservations of unused limited quota, full price big or trophy game animal licenses consistent with and in order to fully implement the requirements of section 1 of this act that become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Protecting the Wildlife Resources of National Parks from External Threats,” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1987).

For article, “The Endangered Species Act and Private Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 479 (1997).

For article, “Cooperative Ecosystem Management: Can an Ecosystem Approach Succeed in Wyoming?” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 629 (1997).

For case note, “Environmental Law — Can NEPA and ESA Work Together? Designations of Critical Habitat for an Endangered Species Must Fulfill National Environmental Policy Act Requirements. Catron County Board of County Commissioners v. United States Fish and Wildlife Service, 75 F.3d 1429, 1996 U.S. App. LEXIS 1479 (10th Cir. 1996),” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 677 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state wildlife possession laws, 50 ALR5th 703.

Necessity and sufficiency of environmental impact statements under § 102(2)(C)) of National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 USC § 4332(2)(C) in cases involving hunting, fishing and related projects, 74 ALR Fed 852.